Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.420.120

Consistent effect and conflict with other state laws.

(1) Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with the compact.

(2) Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a member state in conflict with the compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.

(3) All permissible agreements between the commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms.

[ 2024 c 317 s 13.]